Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2375.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 6558YH (1) 91 th/ns H.F. 2375 Section 1. Section 321.515, subsection 1, unnumbered 1 paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 A driverless-capable vehicle may operate on the public 3 highways of this state without a conventional human driver 4 physically present in the vehicle, unless required under 5 section 321.515A, if the vehicle meets all of the following 6 conditions: 7 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 321.515A Conventional human driver ââ 8 when required. 9 A driverless-capable vehicle operating for commercial 10 purposes, and not for personal use, shall not operate on the 11 public highways of this state without a conventional human 12 driver physically present in the vehicle. The conventional 13 human driver must have the ability to monitor the vehicleâs 14 operation and, if necessary, intervene by taking over the 15 operation of the vehicle manually, including but not limited 16 to by stopping and shutting off the vehicle. A conventional 17 human driver required under this section shall hold a driverâs 18 license and any endorsement that would otherwise be required 19 for the operation of the vehicle, and shall comply with all 20 applicable federal and state laws regulating automated and 21 conventional vehicles. 22